North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-20.4 Delinquency

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Accountability” means that after a child is determined to have committed delinquent behavior, by admission or adjudication, the child is held responsible for the behavior through individualized and structured consequences or sanctions for the loss, damage, or injury suffered and proportionate to the offense.

“Arrest” means a taking into custody of a child by law enforcement in the manner authorized by law to answer for the commission of a delinquent offense.

“Attendant care” is a nonsecure holdover site for delinquent children or children in need of services who have been picked up by law enforcement and need constant short-term supervision on a preadjudicatory basis.

“Child” means an individual who is:

Under the age of eighteen years and is not married; or

Under the age of twenty years with respect to a delinquent act committed while under the age of eighteen years and not married.

“Community-based program” means a nonresidential program.

“Custodian” means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian, which stands in loco parentis to the child and a person that has been given legal custody of the child by order of a court.

“Delinquent act” means an act designated a crime under the law, including local ordinances or resolutions of this state, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or under federal law.

“Delinquent child” means a child who has committed a delinquent act and is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.

“Detention” means a physically secure facility with locked doors. The term does not include shelter care, attendant care, or home confinement.

“Director” means the director of juvenile court services.

“Dispositional stage” means any proceeding after adjudication for a delinquent offense.

“Diversion” means an intervention strategy made by a person with authority which directs the child away from formal court processing to a specifically designed program or activity to hold the child accountable for the actions of the child and prevents further involvement in the formal legal system.

“Division” means the division of juvenile services.

“Evidence-based” means a program or practice that has had multiple randomized control studies demonstrating the program or practice is effective for a specific population, has been researched, and has been rated as effective by a standardized program evaluation tool.

“Facility” means buildings, structures, or systems, including those for essential administration and support, which are used to provide residential treatment for children.

“Fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual” means a relative or other individual who has been determined, after consideration of an assessment that includes a criminal history record investigation under chapter 50-11.3, to be a qualified individual under chapters 27-20.1 and 30.1-27, and who consents in writing to act as a legal guardian.

“Graduated sanctions” means a calibrated system of sanctions designed to ensure that children face timely and consistent consequences that correspond to the frequency and nature of a child’s noncompliant behaviors, public safety risk, and engagement in supervision and services.

“Home” when used in the phrase “to return home” means the abode of the child’s parent with whom the child formerly resided.

“Home confinement” means predisposition or post-disposition temporary placement of a child in the child’s home, or a surrogate home with the consent of the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian for supervision.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department of health and human services.

“Incentives” means calibrated system of rewards designed so that children receive immediate and consistent feedback that supports appropriate behavior and follow through with probation conditions.

“Informal adjustment” means a meeting held by the director of juvenile court or designee to resolve a low-level delinquent referral and is an alternative to the filing of a petition for formal court processing.

“Intensive supervision probation program” means a community-based alternative that provides a higher degree of supervision and use of graduated incentives and sanctions over a child, post-adjudication, to ensure public safety and applies to children who are at high risk to reoffend.

“Juvenile court” means the district court of this state.

“Juvenile drug court” means a program established by the supreme court which is a post-petition or post-adjudication program aimed at intervening in substance use disorders through intense supervision and participation in recovery services.

“Pick up and hold order” means an order of the court to take a child into custody based upon an allegation of delinquency or failure to appear for court.

“Predisposition assessment” means an investigation, assessment, and written report to the court based on the results of risk and need screening and assessment tools regarding a disposition for a delinquent child.

“Proceeding” means any hearing or informal adjustment conducted before a court.

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a licensed or approved residence providing an out-of-home treatment placement for children including a trauma-informed model.

“Referral” means a written report of alleged delinquent behavior of a child which is received by the director of juvenile court.

“Relative” means:

The child’s grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, half-sibling, aunt, great-aunt, uncle, great-uncle, nephew, niece, or first cousin;

An individual with a relationship to the child, derived through a current or former spouse of the child’s parent, similar to a relationship described in subdivision a;

An individual recognized in the child’s community as having a relationship with the child similar to a relationship described in subdivision a; or

The child’s stepparent.

“Risk factors” means characteristics and behaviors that, when addressed or changed, affect a child’s risk for committing delinquent acts.

“Shelter care” means temporary care of a child in physically unrestricted facilities.

“Treatment” means targeting interventions that focus on risk factors, improved mental health, and improved positive youth outcomes.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-02.
Jurisdiction.

Jurisdiction as set forth in section 27-20.2-03 is applicable to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-03.
Venue.

A proceeding under this chapter may be commenced in the county in which the child resides. If delinquent conduct is alleged, the proceeding is commenced in the county in which the acts constituting the alleged delinquent conduct occurred. If delinquent conduct is alleged in part in one county and in part in another county, the venue is in either of the counties.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-04.
Powers and duties of director of juvenile court.

For the purpose of carrying out the objectives and purposes of this chapter and subject to the limitations of this chapter or imposed by the court, a director shall:

Make investigations, reports, and recommendations to the juvenile court.

Receive and examine complaints, referrals, and charges of delinquency for the purpose of considering the commencement of proceedings under this chapter.

Make a determination upon intake of referrals regarding the appropriate manner to handle a child in need of services or a child in need of protection by use of nonjudicial commencement of proceedings under this chapter.

Supervise and assist a child placed on probation for delinquency.

Make appropriate referrals to other private or public agencies of the community if their assistance appears to be needed or desirable.

Issue a temporary custody order concerning a child who is referred to the director’s supervision or care as a delinquent child. Except as provided by this chapter, a director does not have the powers of a law enforcement officer.

Take acknowledgments of instruments for the purpose of this chapter.

Perform all other functions designated by this chapter, under section 27-05-30, or by order of the court, including, if qualified, those of a referee.

Issue an order to a law enforcement authority to transport a child to and from a specified location.

Receive and examine requests for review of a child’s placement at a qualified residential treatment program under the Family First Prevention Services Act [Pub. L. 115-123; 132 Stat. 64; 42 U.S.C. 675].

Any of the foregoing functions may be performed in another state if authorized by the court of this state and permitted by the laws of the other state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-05.
Taking into custody.

A child may be taken into custody:

Pursuant to a pick up and hold order or other order of the court under this chapter;

Pursuant to the laws of arrest and as authorized after scoring of the detention screening tool; or

For preadjudicatory supervision in attendant care or shelter care.

The taking of a child into custody is not an arrest, except for the purpose of determining the validity of the arrest under the Constitution of North Dakota or the United States Constitution.

A law enforcement officer shall transport a child if necessary as determined by the court.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-06.
Detention — Nonsecure care of child. [Effective through July 31, 2022]

A child taken into custody may not be detained or placed in nonsecure care before the hearing on the petition unless the child’s detention or nonsecure care is required to protect the person or property of others or of the child or because the child may abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court or because the child has no parent, guardian, or custodian or other person able to provide supervision and care for the child and return the child to the court if required, or an order for the child’s detention or nonsecure care has been made by the court pursuant to this chapter.

Law enforcement, juvenile court staff, and division staff shall use a detention screening tool to assure the appropriate use of detention and whether the child is a public safety risk. The juvenile court shall establish the detention screening tool, which must include objective factors to aid in the decision of placement of the child. Law enforcement, court records, and division records must include data on detention screening scores and, if the score does not authorize detention, the explanation for the override resulting in placing the juvenile in detention.

The court may place a juvenile in detention before adjudication only if the court finds releasing the child would pose an unreasonable risk to public safety and that all less restrictive alternatives have been considered.

A juvenile may be placed in a secure detention facility if one or more of the following conditions are met:

The child is alleged to have committed an offense that if committed by an adult would constitute a felony against person, felony weapon, or felony drug distribution;

The child has a record of failure to appear in court or there is probable cause to believe that the child will flee the jurisdiction of the court;

The child has violated the terms of detention release on home confinement or electronic monitoring;

There is oral or written verification that the child is an alleged delinquent child sought for an offense in another jurisdiction or that the child left a juvenile detention facility without authorization;

The child is an out-of-state runaway subject to the rules of the interstate commission on juveniles;

The child meets criteria for secure detention on the detention screening tool;

The child meets criteria for an override on the detention screening tool; or

If a child is participating in a juvenile drug court program as a result of an adjudication for a delinquent offense, the court may order the child detained in a juvenile detention center operated pursuant to chapter 12-44.1. The child may be detained twice during the child’s participation in the program with the total period of detention under this section not to exceed four days in a one-year period.

A child may not be placed in detention solely due to lack of supervision alternatives or due to the community’s inability to provide appropriate treatment or services.

Alternatives to secure detention may be utilized to include home confinement, electronic monitoring, and parental or guardian supervision if the court determines there is no unreasonable risk to public safety.

A child placed in detention must have a mental health and trauma screening tool completed by the juvenile detention center or by juvenile court upon entry and provide that information to the juvenile court before release or detention hearing.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-06.
Detention — Nonsecure care of child. [Effective August 1, 2022]

A child taken into custody may not be detained or placed in nonsecure care before the hearing on the petition unless the child’s detention or nonsecure care is required to protect the person or property of others or of the child or because the child may abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court or because the child has no parent, guardian, or custodian or other person able to provide supervision and care for the child and return the child to the court if required, or an order for the child’s detention or nonsecure care has been made by the court pursuant to this chapter.

Law enforcement, juvenile court staff, and division staff shall use a detention screening tool to assure the appropriate use of detention and whether the child is a public safety risk. The juvenile court shall establish the detention screening tool, which must include objective factors to aid in the decision of placement of the child. Law enforcement, court records, and division records must include data on detention screening scores and, if the score does not authorize detention, the explanation for the override resulting in placing the juvenile in detention.

The court may place a juvenile in detention before adjudication only if the court finds releasing the child would pose an unreasonable risk to public safety and that all less restrictive alternatives have been considered.

A juvenile may be placed in a secure detention facility if one or more of the following conditions are met:

The child is alleged to have committed an offense that if committed by an adult would constitute a felony against person, felony weapon, or felony drug distribution;

The child has a record of failure to appear in court or there is probable cause to believe that the child will flee the jurisdiction of the court;

The child has violated the terms of detention release on home confinement or electronic monitoring;

There is oral or written verification that the child is an alleged delinquent child sought for an offense in another jurisdiction or that the child left a juvenile detention facility without authorization;

The child is an out-of-state runaway subject to the rules of the interstate commission on juveniles;

The child meets criteria for secure detention on the detention screening tool; or

The child meets criteria for an override on the detention screening tool.

A child may not be placed in detention by law enforcement or juvenile court, including drug court solely:

Due to a lack of supervision alternatives, service options, or more appropriate facilities.

Due to the community’s inability to provide treatment or services.

Due to a lack of supervision in the home or community.

In order to allow a parent, guardian, or legal custodian to avoid his or her legal responsibility.

Due to a risk of the juvenile’s self-harm.

In order to attempt to punish, treat, or rehabilitate the child.

Due to a request by a victim, law enforcement, or the community.

In order to permit more convenient administrative access to the juvenile.

Alternatives to secure detention may be utilized to include home confinement, electronic monitoring, and parental or guardian supervision if the court determines there is no unreasonable risk to public safety.

A child placed in detention must have a mental health and trauma screening tool completed by the juvenile detention center or by juvenile court upon entry and provide that information to the juvenile court before release or detention hearing.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 26, effective August 1, 2022.

27-20.4-07.
Release or delivery to court.

A person taking a child into custody, with all reasonable speed and without first taking the child elsewhere, shall:

Complete the detention screening instrument and use the results in making a release or hold decision. Release options include allowing a child to return home with parental supervision and a promise to appear for court if notified, or release with limited supervision, such as an electronic monitoring device or conditions for home confinement.

Release the child to the child’s parent, guardian, custodian, or other responsible adult able and willing to assume custody of the child, upon that individual’s promise to bring the child before the court if requested by the court, unless the child’s detention is warranted or required under section 27-20.4-05; or

Bring the child before the court or deliver the child to a detention facility designated by the court or to a medical facility if the child is believed to suffer from a serious physical condition or illness that requires prompt treatment. The person taking the child into custody promptly shall give notice of taking the child into custody, together with a statement of the reason for taking the child into custody, to a parent, guardian, or other custodian and to the court. Any temporary detention or questioning of the child necessary to comply with this subdivision must conform to the procedures and conditions prescribed by this chapter and rules of court.

If a parent, guardian, or other custodian, if requested, fails to bring the child before the court as provided in subsection 1, the court may issue a pick up and hold order directing that the child be taken into custody and brought before the court.

If the petition is not filed within five days after the date of the detention hearing, the child must be released from detention.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-08.
Place of detention.

A child alleged to be delinquent may be detained only in:

A licensed foster home or a home approved by the court;

A facility operated by a licensed child welfare agency;

A detention home or center for delinquent children which is under the direction or supervision of the court or other public authority or of a private agency approved by the court:

Any other suitable place or facility, including a medical facility for the treatment of mental illness, alcoholism, or drug addiction, designated by the court; or

A jail or other facility for the detention of adults only if the facility is not available, the detention is in a room separate and removed from those for adults, it appears to the satisfaction of the court, the director, or designee, that public safety and protection reasonably require detention, and it is so authorized.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-09.
Release from detention or nonsecure care — Hearing — Conditions of release.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

If a child is brought before the court or delivered to a detention or nonsecure care facility designated by the court, the director, the intake officer, or other authorized officer of the court immediately shall make an investigation and release the child unless it appears that the child’s detention is warranted or required under section 27-20.4-05.

Reasonable notice of the release from detention must be provided to any victim as required by subsection 19 of section 12.1-34-02.

If the child is not released, reasonable notice, either oral or written, stating the time, place, and purpose of the detention or shelter care must be given to the child and, if able to be found, to the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian. If the child is not represented by counsel at a proceeding, the court shall inform the child of the right to counsel, regardless of income. Before the commencement of the hearing, the court shall inform the child’s parents, legal guardian, or custodian of the right to counsel at public expense at the dispositional stage if the parent, guardian, or custodian applies and is determined to be indigent and of the child’s right to remain silent with respect to any allegations of delinquent conduct.

If the child is not released from detention, a judge or referee shall hold a detention hearing within twenty-four hours after the time the child is placed in detention, excluding weekends or legal holidays, to determine whether there is probable cause to believe the child has committed the delinquent act alleged, and whether the child’s detention is required under section 27-20.4-05. In determining whether a child requires detention, the court shall consider the results of the detention screening tool.

If the child is not released from nonsecure care, a judge or referee shall hold a hearing promptly and not later than ninety-six hours after the child is placed in nonsecure care to determine whether there is probable cause to believe the child has committed a delinquent act and whether the child’s shelter care is required.

If the child is not released and a parent, guardian, or custodian has not been notified of the hearing, did not appear or waive appearance at the hearing, and files an affidavit showing these facts, the court shall rehear the matter without unnecessary delay and order the child’s release, unless it appears from the hearing that the child’s detention is required under section 27-20.4-05.

If the parents cannot be found or fail to appear for the detention or nonsecure care hearing and the child does not pose a substantial risk to the community and needs to be detained, the human service zone is notified and a child in need of protection or services care hearing is held.

If it appears that any child being held in detention or shelter care may have an intellectual or developmental disability, the court or detention personnel shall refer the child to the department of human services for an eligibility determination for intellectual or developmental disabilities program management services and a level of care assessment and the results must be filed with the court upon completion. The department of human services shall provide status updates to the court within the time required by the court.

If it appears that any child being held in detention or nonsecure care appears to have a serious and persistent mental illness, the detention staff or court intake officer shall request that the court order a diagnostic assessment that includes a recommendation for necessary level of care that must be conducted within forty-eight hours after the court’s order. The person conducting the diagnostic assessment shall file the results with the court.

If an individual who is or appears to be a child is received at a jail facility or other facility for the detention of adult offenders or individuals charged with a crime, the official in charge of the facility immediately shall inform the court and bring the individual before the court upon request or deliver the individual to a detention or nonsecure facility designated by the court.

If a case is transferred to another court for criminal prosecution, the child may be transferred to the appropriate officer or detention facility in accordance with the law governing the detention of persons charged with crime.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-09.
Release from detention or nonsecure care — Hearing — Conditions of release.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

If a child is brought before the court or delivered to a detention or nonsecure care facility designated by the court, the director, the intake officer, or other authorized officer of the court immediately shall make an investigation and release the child unless it appears that the child’s detention is warranted or required under section 27-20.4-05.

Reasonable notice of the release from detention must be provided to any victim as required by subsection 19 of section 12.1-34-02.

If the child is not released, reasonable notice, either oral or written, stating the time, place, and purpose of the detention or shelter care must be given to the child and, if able to be found, to the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian. If the child is not represented by counsel at a proceeding, the court shall inform the child of the right to counsel, regardless of income. Before the commencement of the hearing, the court shall inform the child’s parents, legal guardian, or custodian of the right to counsel at public expense at the dispositional stage if the parent, guardian, or custodian applies and is determined to be indigent and of the child’s right to remain silent with respect to any allegations of delinquent conduct.

If the child is not released from detention, a judge or referee shall hold a detention hearing within twenty-four hours after the time the child is placed in detention, excluding weekends or legal holidays, to determine whether there is probable cause to believe the child has committed the delinquent act alleged, and whether the child’s detention is required under section 27-20.4-05. In determining whether a child requires detention, the court shall consider the results of the detention screening tool.

If the child is not released from nonsecure care, a judge or referee shall hold a hearing promptly and not later than ninety-six hours after the child is placed in nonsecure care to determine whether there is probable cause to believe the child has committed a delinquent act and whether the child’s shelter care is required.

If the child is not released and a parent, guardian, or custodian has not been notified of the hearing, did not appear or waive appearance at the hearing, and files an affidavit showing these facts, the court shall rehear the matter without unnecessary delay and order the child’s release, unless it appears from the hearing that the child’s detention is required under section 27-20.4-05.

If the parents cannot be found or fail to appear for the detention or nonsecure care hearing and the child does not pose a substantial risk to the community and needs to be detained, the human service zone is notified and a child in need of protection or services care hearing is held.

If it appears that any child being held in detention or shelter care may have an intellectual or developmental disability, the court or detention personnel shall refer the child to the department of health and human services for an eligibility determination for intellectual or developmental disabilities program management services and a level of care assessment and the results must be filed with the court upon completion. The department of health and human services shall provide status updates to the court within the time required by the court.

If it appears that any child being held in detention or nonsecure care appears to have a serious and persistent mental illness, the detention staff or court intake officer shall request that the court order a diagnostic assessment that includes a recommendation for necessary level of care that must be conducted within forty-eight hours after the court’s order. The person conducting the diagnostic assessment shall file the results with the court.

If an individual who is or appears to be a child is received at a jail facility or other facility for the detention of adult offenders or individuals charged with a crime, the official in charge of the facility immediately shall inform the court and bring the individual before the court upon request or deliver the individual to a detention or nonsecure facility designated by the court.

If a case is transferred to another court for criminal prosecution, the child may be transferred to the appropriate officer or detention facility in accordance with the law governing the detention of persons charged with crime.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.4-10.
Diversion.

Before an informal adjustment is held or a petition is filed, the director of juvenile court or designee may determine that no further action is required or impose conditions in lieu of further proceedings for the conduct and control of the child with a diversion to a community-based program or service.

A child referred to the court may be considered for diversion if any of the following criteria are met:

The referral is for a delinquent act that is not an offense requiring a notification to be sent to the department of transportation;

The referral is for a delinquent act that has not been previously diverted more than twice by the juvenile court within the last twelve months; or

The referral is not an offense that could require sex offender registration.

Effective August 1, 2023, except for a drug-related offense, simple assault under chapter 12.1-17-01, or domestic violence under chapter 12.1-17-01.2, a child who commits an infraction or misdemeanor offense on school grounds during hours of operation may not be referred to the juvenile court.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-11.
Informal adjustment.

Before a petition is filed, the director of juvenile court, or other officer of the court designated by the court, subject to direction of the court may give counsel and advice to the parties and impose conditions for the conduct and control of the child in lieu of further proceedings with a view to an informal adjustment if it appears:

The admitted facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court;

Counsel, advice, and conditions, if any, for the conduct and control of the child without an adjudication would be in the best interest of the public and the child; and

The child and the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian consent to the conditions with knowledge that consent is not obligatory.

A child referred to the court may be considered for informal adjustment if any of the following criteria are met:

The child has no prior formal court adjudications for a similar case type within the last twelve months;

The referral is for a delinquent act and the child has not been previously diverted more than twice by the juvenile court;

A formal petition was filed but an informal adjustment has been requested by the state’s attorney as part of an agreement with defense counsel or was ordered by the court in dismissing a formal petition;

The referral is a sex offense referral that could require sex offender registration but both the state’s attorney and the victim have agreed to an informal adjustment to address the matter; or

The referral is from the division.

Reasonable written notice of the informal adjustment is given by the court to the victim if one is identified on the referral.

Upon an admission to the referred offense, the director of juvenile court or designee will conduct a preliminary risk and needs assessment and the results must be made available to the child and family. The results of the risk and needs assessment are used to inform the outcome of the informal adjustment. Individuals conducting the risk and needs screening tool must receive training on the appropriate delivery and use of the tool.

An informal agreement may not extend beyond six months from the day the agreement was agreed upon. An extension may be granted by the court for an additional period not to exceed six months. An extension may not authorize the detention of the child if not otherwise permitted by this chapter. If the child admits to driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 39-08-01 or an equivalent ordinance, the child may be required to pay a fine as a condition imposed under this section.

An incriminating statement made by a child to the juvenile court director or designee giving counsel, advice, or as part of the risk and need screening and assessment process, may not be used against the child over objection in any proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-12.
Petition — Preliminary determination.

A petition alleging delinquency under this chapter must be reviewed by the director, the court, or other person designated by the director and authorized by the court to determine whether the filing of the petition is in the best interest of the public and the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-13.
Petition — Who may prepare and file — Review.

A petition alleging delinquent conduct must be prepared, filed, and served upon the parties by the state’s attorney. The juvenile court shall conduct an inquiry into and provide the last known addresses of the parents and guardians of the child in the referral to the state’s attorney.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-14.
Conduct of hearings.

Hearings under this chapter must be conducted by the court without a jury, in an informal but orderly manner and separately from other proceedings not included in section 27-20.2-03 and in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

If the hearing has not been held within the time limit, or any extension of the time limit, required by the North Dakota Rules of Juvenile Procedure, the petition must be dismissed.

The state’s attorney shall present the evidence in support of any allegations of the petition not admitted and otherwise conduct the proceedings on behalf of the state.

Except for informal adjustments under section 27-20.4-10, the proceedings must be recorded by stenographic notes or by electronic, mechanical, or other appropriate means.

The general public must be excluded from all hearings under this chapter. During hearings, only the parties, the parties’ counsel, witnesses, victims, and any other persons the court finds have a proper interest in the proceedings may be admitted by the court. The court may temporarily exclude the child or other person from the hearing if, after being warned by the court that disruptive conduct will cause removal from the courtroom, the child or other person persists in conduct that justifies removal from the courtroom.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-15.
Predispositional assessment.

Before the disposition hearing, the court shall direct the director or designee, to conduct a predisposition assessment and to prepare a written report for the court, unless waived by the court.

The predisposition assessment must consist of a risk and needs assessment together with any other appropriate screenings.

During the pendency of any proceeding the court may order:

The child to be examined at a suitable place by a physician, psychologist, or certified addiction counselor;

The child to be tested by appropriate forensic methods to determine whether the child has been exposed to a controlled substance or other substance considered injurious to the child’s health;

Medical or surgical treatment of a child who is suffering from a serious physical condition or illness, or alcohol or drug abuse, which in the opinion of a licensed physician requires prompt treatment, even if the parent, guardian, or other custodian has not been given notice of a hearing, is not available, or without good cause informs the court of that person’s refusal to consent to the treatment;

An evidence-based risk and needs assessment, mental health screening, or trauma screening; or

The child to be examined to determine the child’s competence or criminal responsibility. If the child is found to lack competency or criminal responsibility the court may:

Dismiss the delinquency proceedings against the child and order the release of the child to the child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian upon conditions considered appropriate by the court;

Suspend the delinquency proceedings against the child for a period of up to one year and order services be provided to the child as an outpatient or inpatient, by commitment to an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities or mental illness; or

Dismiss the delinquency proceedings and direct that child in need of protection proceedings be initiated.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-16.
Adjudication.

If the court finds by proof beyond a reasonable doubt that the child committed the acts by reason of which the child is alleged to be delinquent, the court shall proceed immediately or at a postponed hearing to hear evidence as to whether the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation and to make and file findings. In the absence of evidence to the contrary, evidence of the commission of which constitute a felony is sufficient to sustain a finding that the child is in need of treatment or rehabilitation. If the court finds that the child is not in need of treatment or rehabilitation, the court shall dismiss the proceeding and discharge the child from any detention or other restriction previously ordered.

After hearing the evidence on the petition, the court shall make and file findings as to whether the child is delinquent and whether the acts ascribed to the child were committed by the child. If the court finds the allegations of delinquent conduct have not been established, the court shall dismiss the petition and order the child discharged from any detention or other restriction previously ordered in the proceeding.

In hearings under subsection 1, all evidence helpful in determining the questions presented, including the predisposition assessment and any other oral and written reports, may be received by the court and relied upon to the extent of its probative value even though not otherwise competent in the hearing on the petition. The parties or the counsel of the parties must be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert written reports so received and to cross-examine individuals making the reports. Sources of confidential information need not be disclosed.

On motion of the court or that of a party, the court may continue the hearings under this section for a reasonable period to receive reports and other evidence bearing on the disposition or the need for treatment or rehabilitation. In this event the court shall make an appropriate order for detention of the child or the child’s release from detention subject to supervision of the court during the period of the continuance. In scheduling investigations and hearings the court shall give priority to proceedings in which a child is in detention or has otherwise been removed from the child’s home before an order of disposition has been made.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.